Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1984.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 621, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 168, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 621), is amended to read as follows:
Section 621. As used in the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act:
1. “Board” means the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners;
2. “Emergency” means an event, complaint, or issue that arises
in which there is an immediate need for public protection as it
relates to either specific individualized patient harm or an
appreciable threat to the general public supported by corroborating
evidence;
3. “Emergency suspension” means an immediate temporary
nullification of a Board-issued license by the executive director in
accordance with the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act;
4. “Incompetence” means the physician’s practice falls below
the applicable standard of care without proof of harm or damages;
5. “Malpractice” means the physician has a duty to exercise a
standard of care and has deviated from the applicable standard of
care which results in either a loss of chance or some appreciable
increased risk in the potential for harm or exposure to harm;
6. “Medical negligence” means the physician has a duty to
exercise a standard of care and has breached that duty by failing to
exercise the applicable standard of care, and those actions caused
harm to the patient;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 2

7. “Osteopathic medicine” means a patient-centered system of
health care founded by Andrew Taylor Still, M.D., D.O., and based on
the theory that the body is capable of making its own remedies
against disease and other toxic conditions when it is in a normal
structural relationship and has favorable environmental conditions
and adequate nutrition. Osteopathic medicine emphasizes prevention
and wellness and utilizes generally accepted physical,
pharmacological and surgical methods of diagnosis and therapy while
placing strong emphasis on the importance of body mechanics and
manipulative methods to detect and correct faulty structure and
function;
3. 8. “Osteopathic physician” means a person who is licensed to
practice osteopathic medicine in this state; and
4. 9. “School of osteopathic medicine” or “college of
osteopathic medicine” means a legally chartered school or college
accredited by the Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation
requiring:
a. for admission to its courses of study, a preliminary
education equal to the requirements established by the
American Osteopathic Association, and
b. for granting the D.O. degree, Doctor of Osteopathic
Medicine, actual attendance at such osteopathic school
or college and demonstration of successful completion
of the curriculum and recommendation for graduation.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 622, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 168, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 622), is amended to read as follows:
Section 622. A. 1. Except as otherwise provided by this
section, it shall be unlawful for any person to practice as an
osteopathic physician and surgeon in this state, without a license
to do so, issued by the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners;
provided, that any license or certificate issued under the laws of
this state, authorizing its holder to practice osteopathic medicine,
shall remain in full force and effect. Persons who hold themselves
out as osteopathic physicians in this state without a license issued
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 3

by the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall submit themselves
to the jurisdiction of the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners.
2. Osteopathic physicians engaged in postgraduate training
shall be licensed. Osteopathic physicians engaged in the internship
or PGY-1 year shall be issued a resident training license and all.
All other postgraduate students shall may be issued an advanced
resident training license.
B. 1. A person within or outside of this state who:
a. performs through electronic communications diagnostic
or treatment services or other medical services, or
b. evaluates the medical records of and renders a medical
opinion of a patient in this state, including for the
purpose of medical insurance coverage,
within the scope of practice of an osteopathic physician and surgeon
for any patient whose condition is being diagnosed or treated within
this state shall be licensed in this state, pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act. However, in
such cases, a nonresident osteopathic physician who, while located
outside this state, consults on an irregular basis with a physician
who is located in this state is not required to be licensed in this
state.
2. Any osteopathic physician who engages in the practice of
medicine or the prescription of drugs, devices, or treatments via
electronic means may do so only in the context of an appropriate
physician-patient relationship wherein a proper patient record is
maintained including, at the minimum, a current history and
physical.
3. Any commissioned medical officer of the Armed Forces of the
United States or medical officer of the United States Public Health
Service or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, in the
discharge of official duties whose practice is confined entirely
within federally controlled facilities, who is fully licensed to
practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in one or more
jurisdictions of the United States shall not be required to be
licensed in this state pursuant to the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 4

Act, unless the person already holds an osteopathic medical license
in this state pursuant to the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act. In
such case, the medical officer shall be subject to the Oklahoma
Osteopathic Medicine Act.
4. A person who performs any of the functions covered by this
subsection submits themselves to the jurisdiction of the courts of
this state for the purposes of any cause of action resulting from
the functions performed.
C. A hospital, as defined in Section 1-701 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, or a related institution which has the principal
purpose or function of providing hospital or medical care including,
but not limited to, any corporation, association, trust, or other
organization organized and operated for such purpose, may employ one
or more persons who are duly licensed to practice osteopathic
medicine in this state without being regarded as itself practicing
osteopathic medicine within the meaning and provisions of this
section. The employment by the hospital or related institution of
any person who is duly licensed shall not, in and of itself, be
considered as an act of unprofessional conduct by the person so
employed. Nothing provided herein shall eliminate, limit or
restrict the liability for any act or failure to act of any
hospital, any hospital’s employees or persons duly licensed to
practice osteopathic medicine.
D. Nothing in the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act shall be
construed as to require an osteopathic physician to secure an
Osteopathic Continuous Certification (OCC) as a condition of
licensure, reimbursement, employment or admitting privileges at a
hospital in this state. For the purposes of this subsection,
“Osteopathic Continuous Certification (OCC)” shall mean a continuing
education program measuring core competencies in the practice of
medicine and surgery and approved by a nationally-recognized
accrediting organization.
E. An osteopathic physician licensed under the Oklahoma
Osteopathic Medicine Act may not hold himself or herself out as a
board-certified specialist unless the osteopathic physician has
successfully completed the requirements for certification by the
American Osteopathic Association, the American Board of Medical
Specialties, or the American Association of Physician Specialists.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 5

However, an osteopathic physician may indicate the services offered
and may state that his or her practice is limited to one or more
types of services when this statement accurately reflects the scope
of practice of the osteopathic physician.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 626, as
amended by Section 5, Chapter 168, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 626), is amended to read as follows:
Section 626. A. 1. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners
shall, immediately after the members have qualified, elect a
president, vice president and secretary.
2. The president of the Board shall preside at all meetings of
the Board and perform such other duties as the Board by its rule may
prescribe.
3. The vice president shall perform all the duties of the
president, during the president’s absence or disability.
4. The secretary shall ensure a record is kept of all
proceedings of the Board and perform such other duties as are
prescribed in the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act, or which may be
prescribed by the Board.
B. The Board and such employees as determined by the Board
shall be bonded as required by Sections 85.58Q through 85.58V of
Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. The Board may expend such funds as are necessary in
implementing the duties of the Board. The Board may hire:
1. An executive director, who may hire all necessary
administrative, clerical and stenographic assistance as the Board
shall deem necessary and consistent with a budget to be fixed by the
Board;
2. An attorney to represent the Board in legal matters and to
assist authorized state and county officers in prosecuting or
restraining violations of the provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic
Medicine Act; and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 6

3. One or more investigators, at least one of whom shall be
certified by the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training
as a peace officer, as may be necessary to implement the provisions
of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act. In addition, the
investigators may investigate and inspect, through use of a Board
subpoena, the nonfinancial business records of all persons licensed
pursuant to the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act in order to
determine whether or not licensees are in compliance with the
Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act and the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act or any other law, rule of this state, or
any federal law or rule affecting the practice of osteopathic
medicine.
D. Any licensee or applicant for license subject to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act shall be deemed
to have given consent after presented with a Board subpoena by any
duly authorized employee or agent of the Board to access, enter, or
inspect the records, either on-site or at the Board office, or
facilities of such licensee or applicant subject to the Oklahoma
Osteopathic Medicine Act. The Board may compel any licensee or
applicant through subpoena to appear and give testimony. The
executive director may issue a subpoena for a substance abuse
screening of a licensee or applicant with no advanced notice, with
the written approval of the president of the Board, or in his or her
absence a designated member of the Board. Unless the Board subpoena
is legally challenged, refusal to allow such access, entry, or
inspection or to provide testimony may constitute grounds for
disciplinary action including the denial, nonrenewal, suspension, or
revocation of a license. Upon refusal of such access, entry, or
inspection, or testimony pursuant to this section subsection, the
Board or a duly authorized representative may make application to
enforce the Board subpoena or to obtain a search warrant from the
district court where the facility or records are located to allow
such access, entry, or inspection.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 632, as
amended by Section 8, Chapter 168, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 632), is amended to read as follows:
Section 632. A. The examination of those who desire to
practice as osteopathic physicians shall embrace those general
subjects and topics, a knowledge of which is commonly and generally
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 7

required of candidates for a D.O. degree, Doctor of Osteopathic
Medicine, by accredited osteopathic colleges in the United States.
B. 1. The applicant may be accepted who has successfully
completed the examination sequence of the National Board of
Osteopathic Medical Examiners and meets all other requirements as
prescribed by the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners through rule.
2. The Board may design, and set a scoring percentage required
to pass, a jurisprudence examination for individuals or groups of
license applicants that is designed to test an individual’s
understanding of the laws, rules, and policies of this state
relating to the practice of medicine by an osteopathic physician.
C. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall have
exclusive power and authority to determine the qualifications and
fitness of all applicants for admission to practice osteopathic
medicine in this state. The Board shall require that each applicant
submit to a national criminal history record check as defined in
Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The Board shall
not disseminate criminal history record information resulting from
the record check.
D. 1. The Board is authorized to obtain a national criminal
history record check on osteopathic physician applicants seeking a
letter of qualification for purposes of registration for expedited
licensure through the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact pursuant
to Section 493.7 of this title.
2. Oklahoma osteopathic physician applicants seeking a letter
of qualification under the Compact shall be fingerprinted for the
national criminal history record check. Applicant fingerprints
shall be submitted to the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation and
the national criminal history record check shall be conducted in
accordance with Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
The Bureau shall return national criminal history record check
results to the Board.
3. Results obtained from the national criminal history record
check shall be used solely for the screening of osteopathic
physician applicants and shall be retained by the Board. The Board
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 8

shall not disseminate criminal history record information resulting
from the record check.
4. This subsection shall only apply to Oklahoma osteopathic
physician applicants seeking an expedited license under the Compact.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 633, as last
amended by Section 9, Chapter 168, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 633), is amended to read as follows:
Section 633. A. Each applicant who has met all requirements
for licensure shall be issued a full and unrestricted license to
practice as an osteopathic physician and surgeon. Upon application,
the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners may also issue special
licenses, permits, warrants, and certificates including, but not
limited to, a:
1. Temporary license;
2. Resident training license;
3. Advanced resident training license; or
4. Temporary critical need license under Section 6011 of this
title.
B. The Board shall, through rule, establish restrictions for
special licenses including, but not limited to, training licenses,
to ensure that the holder practices only under appropriate
circumstances as set by the Board.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 635.3, as
amended by Section 12, Chapter 168, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 635.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 635.3. A. There is established in this state a
resident training license for medical school graduates. The
resident training license shall be:
1. Issued by the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners to
eligible physicians;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 9

2. Issued without any continuing education requirements; and
3. Issued for no more than one (1) year.
B. If the physician’s resident training program specifically
approves the resident to have prescribing authority, the resident
training license shall permit the physician to apply for prescribing
privileges from state or federal authorities.
C. The resident training license shall not permit:
1. The physician to practice medicine beyond the scope allowed
by the physician’s training program; or
2. The licensee to practice independent of the residency
program.
D. The resident training license is a prerequisite to
participation in any training program.
E. Any person holding a resident training license is not
guaranteed subsequent full or advanced resident licensure in this
state as an osteopathic physician.
F. Any application for full licensure or advanced resident
licensure shall be adjudged by the Board on its own merits including
training, education and personal background.
G. A physician shall meet the following requirements to be
eligible for a resident training license:
1. Completion of a resident training license application;
2. Payment of the application fee; and
3. Documentation from the applicant’s Oklahoma training program
recommending the physician and stating the applicant meets all the
requirements for such licensure.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 637, as last
amended by Section 14, Chapter 168, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 637), is amended to read as follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 10

Section 637. A. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners may
institute disciplinary action, assess fines, enforce sanctions, or
refuse to admit a person to an examination or may refuse to issue or
reinstate or may suspend or revoke any license issued or reinstated
by the Board upon proof that the applicant or holder of such a
license:
1. Has obtained a license, license renewal or authorization to
sit for an examination, as the case may be, through fraud,
deception, misrepresentation or bribery; or has been granted a
license, license renewal or authorization to sit for an examination
based upon a material mistake of fact;
2. Has engaged in the use or employment of dishonesty, fraud,
misrepresentation, false promise, false pretense, unethical conduct
or unprofessional conduct, as may be determined by the Board, in the
performance of the functions or duties of an osteopathic physician
including, but not limited to, the following:
a. obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge,
tuition or other compensation by fraud, deception or
misrepresentation; willfully and continually
overcharging or overtreating patients; or charging for
visits to the physician’s office which did not occur
or for services which were not rendered,
b. using intimidation, coercion or deception to obtain or
retain a patient or discourage the use of a second
opinion or consultation,
c. willfully performing inappropriate or unnecessary
treatment, diagnostic tests or osteopathic medical or
surgical services,
d. delegating administrative professional
responsibilities to a person who is not qualified by
training, skill, competency, age, or experience or
licensure to perform them, noting that delegation may
only occur within an appropriate physician-patient
relationship, wherein a proper patient record is
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 11

maintained including, but not limited to, at the
minimum, a current history and physical,
e. delegating medical practice responsibilities to a
person who is not qualified by licensure or training
to perform such responsibilities. Delegation may only
occur within an appropriate physician-patient
relationship in which a proper patient record is
maintained,
f. misrepresenting that any disease, ailment, or
infirmity can be cured by a method, procedure,
treatment, medicine or device,
f. g. acting in a manner which results in termination of
employment directly related to patient care,
resignation while under investigation, resignation in
lien of termination, or a final disciplinary action by
any professional society or, association or, medical
practice group, hospital, or medical staff of such
hospital in this or any other state, whether agreed to
voluntarily or not, if the action was in any way
related to professional conduct, professional
competence, malpractice or any other violation of the
Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act,
g. signing a blank prescription form; or dispensing,
prescribing, administering or otherwise distributing
any drug, controlled substance or other treatment
without sufficient examination or the establishment of
a physician-patient relationship, or for other than
medically accepted therapeutic or experimental or
investigational purpose duly authorized by a state or
federal agency, or not in good faith to relieve pain
and suffering, or not to treat an ailment, physical
infirmity or disease, or violating any state or
federal law on controlled dangerous substances
including, but not limited to,
h. prescribing, dispensing or administering opioid drugs
in excess of the maximum limits authorized in Section
2-309I of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes or
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 12

violating the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances
Act, Section 2-101 et seq. of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes,
h. i. engaging in any sexual activity within a physician-
patient relationship,
i. j. terminating the care of a patient without adequate
notice or without making other arrangements for the
continued care of the patient,
j. k. failing to furnish a copy of a patient’s medical
records upon a proper request from the patient or
legal agent of the patient or another physician; or
failing to comply with any other law relating to
medical records,
k. l. failing to comply with any subpoena issued by the
Board,
l. m. violating a probation agreement with or order from
this the Board or any other agency, and
m. n. failing to keep complete and accurate records of
purchase and disposal of controlled drugs or narcotic
drugs dangerous substances;
3. Has engaged in gross negligence, gross malpractice or gross:
a. incompetence,
b. malpractice, or
c. medical negligence;
4. Has engaged in repeated acts of negligence, malpractice or
incompetence;
5. Has been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a
plea of guilty or nolo contendere in a criminal prosecution, for any
offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions or
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 13

duties of an osteopathic physician, whether or not a sentence is
imposed, and regardless of the pendency of an appeal;
6. 5. Has had the authority to engage in the activities
regulated by the Board revoked, suspended, restricted, modified or
limited, or has been reprimanded, warned or censured, probated or
otherwise disciplined by any other state or federal agency whether
or not voluntarily agreed to by the physician including, but not
limited to, the denial of licensure, surrender of the license,
permit or authority, allowing the license, permit or authority to
expire or lapse, or discontinuing or limiting the practice of
osteopathic medicine pending disposition of a complaint or
completion of an investigation;
7. 6. Has violated or failed to comply with provisions of any
act or regulation administered by the Board;
8. 7. Is incapable, for medical or psychiatric or any other
good cause, of discharging the functions of an osteopathic physician
in a manner consistent with the public’s health, safety and welfare;
9. 8. Has been guilty of advertising advertised by means of
knowingly false or deceptive statements;
10. 9. Has been guilty of advertising, practicing, or
attempting advertised, practiced, or attempted to practice under a
name other than one’s own;
11. 10. Has violated or refused to comply with a lawful order
of the Board;
12. 11. Has been guilty of habitual drunkenness, or habitual
addiction to the use of morphine, cocaine or other habit-forming
drugs improperly used medications, legal or illegal drugs or
substances, or alcohol in any manner which could adversely impact
the physician’s ability to provide quality unimpaired care to
patients;
13. 12. Has been guilty of demonstrated personal offensive
behavior, which would may include, but not be limited to, obscenity,
lewdness, and molestation;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 14

14. 13. Has performed an abortion as defined by Section 1-730
of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, except for an abortion
necessary to prevent the death of the mother or to prevent
substantial or irreversible physical impairment of the mother that
substantially increases the risk of death. The performance of an
abortion on the basis of the mental or emotional health of the
mother shall be a violation of this paragraph, notwithstanding a
claim or diagnosis that the woman may engage in conduct which she
intends to result in her death. The Board shall impose a penalty as
provided in this section and in Section 637.1 of this title on a
licensee who violates this paragraph. The penalty shall include,
but not be limited to, suspension of the license for a period not
less than one (1) year;
15. 14. Has been adjudicated to be insane, or incompetent, or
admitted to an institution for the treatment of psychiatric
disorders;
16. 15. Has knowingly provided gender transition procedures as
defined in Section 2607.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes to a
child;
17. 16. Has violated any of the provisions of the Oklahoma
Pharmacy Act, which shall be punishable by appropriate actions
established in rules promulgated by the Board; or
18. 17. Has breached the American Osteopathic Association Code
of Ethics or the Osteopathic Oath; or
18. Has violated or aided another in violating the medical
marijuana laws of this state as described under Section 638.1 of
this title or any rules or guidance issued under such section.
B. The Board may enter an order denying licensure or imposing
any of the penalties as prescribed by rule against any applicant for
licensure or licensee who is found guilty of violating any provision
of subsection A of this section. In determining what action is
appropriate, the Board shall first consider what sanctions are
necessary to protect the public or to compensate the patient. Only
after those sanctions have been imposed may the Board consider and
include in the order requirements designed to rehabilitate the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 15

physician. All costs associated with compliance with orders issued
under this subsection shall be the obligation of the physician.
C. In any administrative action against a physician that does
not involve revocation or suspension of a license, the Board shall
have the burden, by the greater weight of the evidence, to establish
the existence of grounds for disciplinary action. The Board shall
establish grounds for revocation or suspension of a license by clear
and convincing evidence.
D. When determining appropriate sanctions to protect the
public, the Board shall consider if the osteopathic physician has
previously been found by the Board to have committed multiple acts
of medical negligence or malpractice.
E. The Board shall not reinstate the license or certificate of
an osteopathic physician, or cause a license or certificate to be
issued to a person it has deemed unqualified, until such time as it
is satisfied that he or she has complied with all the terms and
conditions set forth in the final order and that such person is
capable of safely engaging in the practice of osteopathic medicine.
However, At a minimum the Board shall not issue a license to, or
reinstate the license of, any osteopathic physician consider:
1. Whether the licensee or prospective licensee has been found
by the Board to have committed repeated multiple acts of medical
negligence or malpractice, regardless of the;
2. The extent to which the licensee or prospective licensee has
complied with all terms and conditions set forth in the final order
or is capable; and
3. The licensee or prospective licensee’s capability of safely
engaging in the practice of osteopathic medicine.
E. F. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall neither
refuse to renew, nor shall only suspend, nor revoke any, or refuse
to renew a license, however, for any one or more of these the
causes, unless specified in this section if the person accused has
been given at least twenty (20) days’ notice in writing of the
charge against him or her and a public hearing is held by the Board;
provided, three-fourths (3/4) of a quorum present at a meeting may
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 16

vote to suspend a license in an emergency situation if the licensee
affected is provided a public hearing within thirty (30) days of the
emergency suspension.
F. G. The executive director may issue an emergency suspension
to any license issued by the Board if an emergency exists and the
executive director has consulted a medical advisor prior to the
issuance of the emergency suspension. An emergency suspension shall
be effective for a period of not more than thirty (30) days. During
the period of emergency suspension, the individual affected is
entitled to a hearing at the next regularly scheduled Board meeting,
or a special Board meeting shall be called with at least three-
fourths (3/4) of a quorum present. At the hearing the Board may
vote to issue a temporary order to refuse renewal, table a renewal,
or temporarily suspend a license pending a full investigation and
hearing. If no hearing is held within the thirty-day period of
emergency suspension, the license shall revert to its status prior
to issuance of the emergency suspension.
H. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall have the
power to order or subpoena the attendance of witnesses, the
inspection of records and premises and the production of relevant
books and papers for the investigation of matters that may come
before it. The presiding officer of the Board or his or her
designee shall have the authority to compel the giving of testimony
as is conferred on courts of justice.
G. I. Any osteopathic physician in this state whose license to
practice osteopathic medicine is revoked or suspended under this
section shall have the right to seek judicial review of a ruling of
the Board pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act.
H. J. The Board may enact rules necessary or appropriate to the
performance, enforcement, or carrying out of any of the purposes,
objectives, or provisions of this section.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY Section 16, Chapter 168, O.S.L.
2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 637.3), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 637.3. A. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners is
hereby given quasi-judicial powers while sitting as a Board for the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 17

purpose of revoking, suspending, or imposing other disciplinary
actions upon the license of an osteopathic physician or and surgeon
of this state.
B. To the extent necessary to allow the Board the power to
enforce disciplinary actions imposed by the Board, in the exercise
of its authority, the Board may punish willful violations of its
orders and impose additional penalties as allowed by Section 638 of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 641, as
amended by Section 17, Chapter 168, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 641), is amended to read as follows:
Section 641. A. All persons legally licensed to practice
osteopathic medicine in this state, on or before the first day of
July of each year, shall apply to the State Board of Osteopathic
Examiners, on forms furnished thereby, for a renewal certificate of
registration entitling such licensee of such person’s license to
practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in Oklahoma during the
next ensuing fiscal year.
B. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners may prescribe
through rule the necessary information required relevant to a
licensee’s professional activity including, but not limited to:
1. Any action taken against the licensee for acts or conduct
similar to acts or conduct described in the Oklahoma Osteopathic
Medicine Act as grounds for disciplinary action;
2. Any adverse judgment, settlement, or award against the
licensee arising from a professional liability claim;
3. The licensee’s voluntary surrender of or voluntary
limitation on any license or authorization to practice medicine and
surgery in any jurisdiction including military, public health, and
foreign;
4. Any denial to the licensee of a license or authorization to
practice medicine and surgery by any jurisdiction including
military, public health, or foreign;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 18

5. The licensee’s voluntary resignation from the medical staff
of any health care institution or voluntary limitation of the
licensee’s staff privileges at such an institution if that action
occurred while the licensee was under formal or informal
investigation by the institution or a committee thereof for any
reason related to alleged medical incompetence, unprofessional or
unethical conduct, or mental or physical impairment;
6. The licensee’s voluntary resignation or withdrawal from a
national, state, or county medical society, association, or
organization if that action occurred while the licensee was under
formal or informal investigation or review by that body for any
reason related to alleged medical incompetence, unprofessional or
unethical conduct, or mental or physical impairment;
7. Whether the licensee has had any health conditions that may
affect his or her ability to practice safely. Disclosures shall
focus on current impairments that directly affect clinical
competence or adversely affect ability to practice medicine in a
competent, ethical, and professional manner, not on past or managed
health conditions that do not impair professional duties; and
8. The licensee’s completion of continuing medical education or
other forms of professional maintenance or evaluation, including
specialty board certification or recertification, during the
previous registration period.
C. 1. Each application shall be accompanied by a renewal fee
in an amount sufficient to cover the cost and expense incurred by
the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, as provided by rule for a
renewal of the person’s certificate physician’s license to practice
osteopathic medicine.
2. The Board may provide for the late renewal of a license upon
payment of a late fee in accordance with Board rules.
D. 1. In addition to the payment of the annual renewal fee,
each licensee applying for a renewal of the certificate license
shall furnish to the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners proof that
the person has attended at least two (2) days sixteen (16) hours of
the annual educational program conducted by the Oklahoma Osteopathic
Association, or its equivalent, as determined by the Board, in the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 19

fiscal year preceding the application for a renewal; provided, the
Board may excuse the failure of the licensee to attend the
educational program in the case of illness or other unavoidable
casualty rendering it impossible for the licensee to have attended
the educational program or its equivalent.
2. The Board shall require that the licensee receive not less
than one (1) hour of education in pain management or one (1) hour of
education in opioid use or addiction each year preceding an
application for renewal of a license, unless the licensee has
demonstrated to the satisfaction of the Board that the licensee does
not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration
registration number. Such education may be held at the annual
educational program referenced in paragraph 1 of this subsection.
E. The secretary of the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners
shall send a written electronic notice to every person holding a
legal certificate license to practice osteopathic medicine in this
state, at least thirty (30) days prior to the first day of July each
year, directed to the last-known electronic mail address of the
licensee, notifying the licensee that it will be necessary for the
licensee to pay the renewal license fee as herein provided, and
proper forms shall accompany the notice upon which the licensee
shall make application for renewal of the certificate including
instructions for the electronic renewal process.
F. The licensee shall attest to the veracity of the application
form for license renewal. Failure to report fully and correctly
shall be grounds for disciplinary action by the Board.
G. The Board shall establish a system for reviewing renewal
forms. The Board may initiate investigations and disciplinary
proceedings based on information submitted by licensees for license
renewal.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 645, as
amended by Section 24, Chapter 168, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 645), is amended to read as follows:
Section 645. A. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall
adopt such rules as may be necessary to implement the provisions of
the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act and may establish fees
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 20

authorized but not specified in the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine
Act.
B. The Board shall promulgate rules to identify essential
elements of education and practice necessary to protect the public.
C. The Board may prescribe by rule administrative remedies,
disciplinary actions, sanctions, and administrative procedures to
provide remedies and disciplinary actions for licensee violations of
statutory- or regulatory-prescribed unprofessional conduct, to
include fines up to the limits otherwise prescribed by statute or
rule.
D. The Board may provide by rule or procedures for the licensee
to contest or dispute any administrative action, procedures for
resolution of any such contest or dispute, and appropriate
protection of private information consistent with state and federal
law.
SECTION 11. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 21

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 30th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1984 Page 22